dev/kr_to_apertium.lexc
!! Converts KR-code to Apertium's morphologic tags, as present in the Apertium
!! stream format.

LEXICON Root
<[%! | %? | %: | %. | %; | %/ | %.%.%.] %/:0>	PunctSent;
<%- %/:0>			PunctGuio;
<%, %/:0>			PunctCm;
<[%" | „ | ”]%/:0>		PunctQuot;
<%' %/:0>			PunctApos;
<v a n %/:0>			VbSer;
a%/ART:a%<det%>%<def%>		#;
az%/ART:az%<det%>%<def%>	#;
ez%/NOUN:ez%<prn%>		NominalNumber;
az%/NOUN:az%<prn%>		NominalNumber;
emez%/NOUN:emez%<prn%>		NominalNumber;
amaz%/NOUN:amaz%<prn%>		NominalNumber;
egy%/ART:egy%<det%>%<ind%>	#;
én%/NOUN:én%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
te%/NOUN:te%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
ő%/NOUN:ő%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
ön%/NOUN:ön%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
mi%/NOUN:mi%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
ti%/NOUN:ti%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
ők%/NOUN:ők%<prn%>%<pers%>	PersProPostp;
ki%/NOUN:ki%<n%>%<itg%>			NominalNumber;
kicsoda%/NOUN:kicsoda%<n%>%<itg%>	NominalNumber;
mi%/NOUN:mi%<n%>%<itg%>			NominalNumber;
micsoda%/NOUN:micsoda%<n%>%<itg%>	NominalNumber;
hány%/NUM:hány%<num%>%<itg%>		NominalNumber;
mennyi%/NUM:mennyi%<num%>%<itg%>	NominalNumber;
hol%/ADV:hol%<adv%>%<itg%>		#;
hova%/ADV:hova%<adv%>%<itg%>		#;  ! hova = hol + ill/all?
hová%/ADV:hova%<adv%>%<itg%>		#;
hogyan%/ADV:hogyan%<adv%>%<itg%>	#;
mikor%/ADV:mikor%<adv%>%<itg%>		#;
ekkor%/ADV:ekkor%<cnjadv%>		#;
mikor%/CONJ:mikor%<cnjadv%>		#;
aztán%/CONJ:aztán%<cnjadv%>		#;
így%/CONJ:így%<cnjadv%>			#;
< [A|Á|B|C|D|E|É|F|G|H|I|Í|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ó|Ö|Ő|P|Q|R|S|T|U|Ú|Ü|Ű|V|W|X|Y|Z] [? - [%/ | %+]]* %/:0 {NOUN}:%<np%> >			Nominal;
< [? - [A|Á|B|C|D|E|É|F|G|H|I|Í|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ó|Ö|Ő|P|Q|R|S|T|U|Ú|Ü|Ű|V|W|X|Y|Z]] [? - [%/ | %+]]* %/:0 {NOUN}:%<n%> >			Nominal;
<[? - [%/ | %+]]+ %/:0>			KRRoot;  ! All the other words

! TODO: the order should be different, and also this should be e.g.
! én<prn><pers><p1><sg><mf>+alá<post>. Implement it with flag diacritics once
! they get fixed.
LEXICON PersProPostp
%<POSTP%<ALÁ%>%>:%<post%>	PersProPerson;
%<POSTP%<ALATT%>%>:%<post%>	PersProPerson;
0				PersProPerson;
! TODO: the rest

LEXICON PersProPerson
%<PERS%<1%>%>:%<p1%>%<mf%>	PersProNumber;
%<PERS%<2%>%>:%<p2%>%<mf%>	PersProNumber;
%<PERS%>:%<p3%>%<mf%>		PersProNumber;

! WARNING: for övéi, ocamorph returns the invalid analysis <PLUR<ANP>>, instead
! of <ANP<PLUR>>. If this bug gets fixed, this lexicon will have to be updated.
! TODO <PLUR<FAM>> to also be a pxp here?
LEXICON PersProNumber
%<PLUR%>:%<pl%>			PersProAnp;
%<PLUR%<FAM%>%>:%<plfam%>	PersProAnp;
0:%<sg%>			PersProAnp;
%<PLUR%<ANP%>%>:%<sg%>%<pxp	PersProAnp2;

LEXICON PunctSent
PUNCT:%<sent%>	#;

LEXICON PunctGuio
PUNCT:%<guio%>	#;

LEXICON PunctCm
PUNCT:%<cm%>	#;

LEXICON PunctQuot
PUNCT:%<quot%>	#;

LEXICON PunctApos
PUNCT:%<apos%>	#;

! van/VERB<MODAL> => <vbser><vbmod>, but we cannot do that => <vbser>
LEXICON VbSer
VERB:%<vbser%>			VerbModes;
VERB%<MODAL%>:%<vbser%>		VerbModes;

LEXICON KRRoot
!NOUN:%<n%>	Nominal;  ! Nouns are handled in Root
ADJ:%<adj%>	Nominal;
NUM:%<num%>	Nominal;
DET:%<predet%>	Nominal;
VERB:0		Verb;
ADV:%<adv%>	#;
POSTP:%<post%>	#;
CONJ:%<cnjcoo%>	#;  ! cnjadv ??? TODO: handle w/ lemmas
PREP:%<pr%>	#;  ! wasn't in hun.dix
PREV:%<prevb%>	WordEnd;  ! NEW!
UTT-INT:%<ij%>	#;
ONO:%<onom%>	#;

LEXICON Nominal
		NominalNumber;

LEXICON NominalNumber
%<PLUR:0	NominalNumberFam;
0:%<sg%>	NominalPoss;

LEXICON NominalNumberFam
%<FAM%>%>:%<plfam%>	NominalPossPl;	! NEW
%>:%<pl%>		NominalPossPl;

LEXICON NominalPoss
%<POSS%>:%<px3s 		NominalPossObj;
%<POSS%<1%>%>:%<px1s		NominalPossObj;
%<POSS%<2%>%>:%<px2s		NominalPossObj;
%<POSS%<PLUR%>%>:%<px3p		NominalPossObj;
%<POSS%<1%>%<PLUR%>%>:%<px1p	NominalPossObj;
%<POSS%<2%>%<PLUR%>%>:%<px2p	NominalPossObj;
0				NominalAnp;

! TODO flag diacritics
LEXICON NominalPossPl
%<POSS%>:%<px3s 		NominalPossObjPl;
%<POSS%<1%>%>:%<px1s		NominalPossObjPl;
%<POSS%<2%>%>:%<px2s		NominalPossObjPl;
%<POSS%<PLUR%>%>:%<px3p		NominalPossObjPl;
%<POSS%<1%>%<PLUR%>%>:%<px1p	NominalPossObjPl;
%<POSS%<2%>%<PLUR%>%>:%<px2p	NominalPossObjPl;
0				NominalAnp;

LEXICON NominalPossObj
0:s%>		NominalAnp;

LEXICON NominalPossObjPl
0:p%>		NominalAnp;

LEXICON NominalAnp
%<ANP%>:%<pxs%>		NominalCas;
%<ANP%<PLUR%>%>:%<pxp%>	NominalCas;
0			NominalCas;

! ANP's on personal pronouns can stack
! WARNING The version of ocamorph we have returns <ANP<PLUR>><ANP<PLUR>>,
! instead of properly nesting the second ANP: <ANP<PLUR><ANP<PLUR>>>
! The three lexicons below handle both.
LEXICON PersProAnp
%<ANP:%<pxs		PersProAnp2;
%<ANP%<PLUR%>:%<pxp	PersProAnp2;
%<ANP%>:%<pxs		PersProAnp2Bug;
%<ANP%<PLUR%>%>:%<pxp	PersProAnp2Bug;
0			NominalCas;

LEXICON PersProAnp2Bug
0:%>			NominalCas;
%<ANP%>:s%>		NominalCas;
%<ANP%<PLUR%>%>:p%>	NominalCas;

LEXICON PersProAnp2
%>			NominalCas;
%<ANP%>%>:s%>		NominalCas;
%<ANP%<PLUR%>%>%>:p%>	NominalCas;

LEXICON NominalCas
0:%<nom%>		WordEnd;  ! ember
%<CAS%<ACC%>%>:%<acc%>	#;  ! embert
%<CAS%<DAT%>%>:%<dat%>	#;  ! embernek
%<CAS%<INS%>%>:%<ins%>	#;  ! kalapáccsal
%<CAS%<COM%>%>:%<com%>	#;  ! emberrel
%<CAS%<CAU%>%>:%<cau%>	#;  ! emberért
%<CAS%<FIN%>%>:%<fin%>	#;  ! emberért (does FIN exist at all?)
%<CAS%<TRA%>%>:%<tra%>	#;  ! emberré
%<CAS%<INE%>%>:%<ine%>	#;  ! emberben
%<CAS%<SUE%>%>:%<ses%>	#;  ! emberen
%<CAS%<ADE%>%>:%<ade%>	#;  ! embernél
%<CAS%<ILL%>%>:%<ill%>	#;  ! emberbe
%<CAS%<SBL%>%>:%<sub%>	#;  ! emberre
%<CAS%<ALL%>%>:%<all%>	#;  ! emberhez
%<CAS%<ELA%>%>:%<ela%>	#;  ! emberből
%<CAS%<DEL%>%>:%<dela%>	#;  ! emberről
%<CAS%<ABL%>%>:%<abl%>	#;  ! embertől
%<CAS%<TER%>%>:%<term%>	#;  ! emberig
%<CAS%<FOR%>%>:%<ess1%>	#;  ! emberként
%<CAS%<ESS%>%>:%<ess2%>	#;  ! emberül
%<CAS%<TEM%>%>:%<tem%>	#;  ! emberül

! vbser is handled in Root & VbSer
LEXICON Verb
%<MODAL%>:%<vbmod%>	VerbModes;  ! ???
0:%<vblex%>		VerbModes;

LEXICON VerbModes
%<PAST%>:%<past%>	VerbNumber;
%<COND%>:%<cni%>	VerbNumber;
%<SUBJUNC-IMP%>:%<pis%>	VerbNumber;
%<INF%>:%<inf%>		VerbNumber;
0:%<pres%>		VerbNumber;

LEXICON VerbNumber
%<PLUR%>:%<pl%>	VerbPerson;
0:%<sg%>	VerbPerson;

LEXICON VerbPerson
%<PERS%<1:%<s1p%>	VerbPerson1;
%<PERS%<2%>%>:%<s2p%>	VerbDef;
0:%<s3p%>		VerbDef;

LEXICON VerbPerson1
%<OBJ%<2%>%>%>%>:%<o2p%>	VerbDef;  ! NEW
%>%>:0				VerbDef;

LEXICON VerbDef
%<DEF%>:%<def%> #;
0:%<ind%>	#;

! End of the word, or the first part of a compound word
LEXICON WordEnd
%+	Root;
0	#;
